Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-260.05
Juvenile
pretrial diversion program; optional services.

A
juvenile pretrial diversion program may:

(1) Provide screening services to the court and county attorney
or city attorney to help identify likely candidates for the program;

(2) Establish goals for diverted juvenile offenders and monitor
performance of the goals;

(3) Coordinate chemical dependency
assessments of diverted juvenile offenders when indicated, make appropriate
referrals for treatment, and monitor treatment and aftercare;

(4) Coordinate individual, group,
and family counseling services;

(5) Oversee the payment of victim restitution by diverted
juvenile offenders;

(6) Assist diverted juvenile offenders in identifying and
contacting appropriate community resources;

(7) Coordinate educational services
to diverted juvenile offenders to enable them to earn a high school diploma
or general education development diploma; and

(8) Provide accurate information on how diverted juvenile
offenders perform in the program to the juvenile courts, county attorneys,
city attorneys, defense attorneys, and probation officers.

Laws 2003, LB 43, § 4;

Laws 2013, LB561, § 15.